Maryland, session 2025, HB0737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
5–602.2.
(A) A COMPETENT INDIVIDUAL MAY MAKE A NONOPIOID ADVANCE
DIRECTIVE STATING THAT THE INDIVIDUAL REFUSES THE OFFER OR
ADMINISTRATION OF ANY OPIOID MEDICATION INCLUDING DURING AN EMERGENCY
WHERE THE INDIVIDUAL IS UNABLE TO COMMUNICATE THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PREFERENCE REGARDING THE USE OF OPIOIDS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0737*

HOUSE BILL 737
(B) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAKING A NONOPIOID ADVANCE DIRECTIVE
SHALL FOLLOW THE PROCEDURES FOR MAKING AN ADVANCE DIRECTIVE PROVIDED
UNDER § 5–602 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE PROCEDURES PROVIDED UNDER § 5–604 OF THIS SUBTITLE
FOR THE REVOCATION OF AN ADVANCE DIRECTIVE SHALL APPLY TO THE
REVOCATION OF A NONOPIOID ADVANCE DIRECTIVE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A MODEL NONOPIOID ADVANCE
DIRECTIVE FORM AND MAKE THE FORM AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.